District of Columbia statutes.
20-503

Issuance and content of letters.

After appointment, letters shall be issued to the personal representative by the Register. Letters shall contain:

(a)

the name and address of the Court;

(b)

the name of the decedent and the personal representative;

(c)

the date of appointment of the personal representative;

(d)

the date the will, if any, was admitted to probate;

(e)

the signature of the Register and the seal of the Court;

(f)

the date the letters were issued; and

(g)

whether the administration is supervised or unsupervised and, if supervised, any limitations on the powers of the personal representative.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(w), 42 DCR 63

History

1981 Ed., § 20-503.

Prior Codifications

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-501.

Editor's Notes